Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-806
County or political subdivision; prohibited acts.

The Private Prison Contracting Act does not authorize a county or other political subdivision to enter into a contract with a private prison contractor to construct or operate a correctional facility within or on behalf of such county or other political subdivision.

Laws 2001, LB 85, § 6.